Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
CHAPTER 9 Georgia Merchant Acquirer Limited Purpose Bank
7-9-11.3.
Notice of merger or consolidation; filing.

Upon adoption of the plan of merger or consolidation as provided in Code Section 7-9-11.2, parties to a merger or consolidation shall file with the department articles of a merger or consolidation pursuant to the requirements of this Code section together with the fee required by Code Section 7-1-862.

The articles of merger or consolidation shall be signed by two duly authorized officers of each party to a merger or consolidation plan under their respective seals and shall contain:

The names of parties to a merger or consolidation plan and the name of the resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;

The street address and county location of the main office and registered agent and office of each party;

The votes by which the merger or consolidation plan was adopted, a copy of the notice of each meeting held in connection with such adoption, and the time and place such meeting or meetings were held;

The names and addresses of the initial directors of the resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;

In the case of a merger, any amendments to the articles of the resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank;

In the case of a consolidation, the requirements for articles of a new merchant acquirer limited purpose bank as provided for by paragraphs (4) through (8) of subsection (a) of Code Section 7-9-5; and

The merger or consolidation plan.

Together with the articles of merger or consolidation, parties to a merger or consolidation shall deliver to the department a copy of the notice of merger or consolidation and an undertaking, which may appear in the articles of merger or consolidation or be set forth in a letter or other instrument executed by an officer or any person authorized to act on behalf of such merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, that the request for publication of a notice of filing the articles of merger or consolidation and payment therefor will be made as required by subsection (d) of this Code section.

No later than the next business day after filing the articles of merger or consolidation with the department, parties to a merger or consolidation shall transmit for publication, to the publisher of a newspaper which is the official organ of the county where the main office of each party is located, a notice which shall contain a statement that the articles of merger or consolidation have been filed with the department, the names of entities which are parties to the proposed merger or consolidation, and, in the case of a merger, the proposed name of the surviving merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. The parties shall include in the notice a designated location where a copy of the articles of merger or consolidation may be examined. Such notice shall be published once a week for two consecutive weeks commencing within ten days after receipt of the notice by the newspaper.

In the event a merger or consolidation plan is amended as provided for in Code Section 7-9-11.2, parties shall promptly file with the department an amendment to the articles of consolidation or merger reflecting such amendment of the merger or consolidation plan.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-11.4.
Parties to merger or consolidation plan to file application; requirements.

In addition to the filing of articles of merger and consolidation under Code Section 7-9-11.3, the parties to a merger or consolidation plan shall also file with the department:

An application including any information desired by the department in order to evaluate the proposed merger or consolidation, which shall be made available in the form specified by the department;

Applicable fees established by regulation of the department to defray the expenses of the investigation required by Code Section 7-9-11.5; and

If the merger or consolidation involves the adoption of a new name, a certificate issued by the Secretary of State reserving such name under Code Section 7-1-131.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-11.5.
Investigation of merger or consolidation plan; approval or disapproval.

Upon receipt of the articles of merger or consolidation and the filings required by Code Section 7-9-11.4, the department shall conduct such investigation as it may deem necessary to ascertain whether:

The articles of merger or consolidation and supporting items satisfy the requirements of this chapter;

The merger or consolidation plan and any modification thereof adequately protect the interests of creditors and shareholders;

The requirements for a merger or consolidation under all applicable laws have been satisfied and the resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank would satisfy the applicable requirements of this chapter; and

The merger or consolidation would not adversely impact the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, entities engaged in merchant acquiring activities or settlement activities, or the payment card network. In making such a determination, the department will take into consideration competitive, financial, managerial, safety and soundness, compliance, and other concerns with respect to the merger or consolidation plan and all parties.

Within 90 days after receipt of the articles of merger or consolidation and the filings required by Code Section 7-9-11.4 or within an additional period of not more than 30 days after an amendment to the application is received within the initial 90 day period, the department shall, in its discretion, approve or disapprove such articles on the basis of its investigation and the criteria set forth in subsection (a) of this Code section. Except as provided in Code Section 7-9-11.6, the department shall provide written notice of its approval along with a copy of the articles of merger or consolidation to the Secretary of State. The department shall provide parties to the merger or consolidation plan written notice of its decision and, in the event of disapproval, a general statement of explanation for its decision. The decision of the department shall be conclusive; provided, however, that such decision may be subject to judicial review as provided for in Code Section 7-1-90.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-11.6.
Issuance of certificate of merger or consolidation.

Upon payment of all required taxes, fees, and charges, the Secretary of State shall issue to any resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank a certificate of merger or consolidation with the approved articles of merger or consolidation attached thereto, provided that the name of the resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank in a merger or consolidation has been reserved by a merging or consolidating party or is available on the records of the Secretary of State. The resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall retain a copy of such certificate, articles, and approval by the department.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.6

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-11.7.
Certificate effective upon issuance by Secretary of State; evidence of satisfactory performance; effect of merger.

A merger or consolidation of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall become effective upon the issuance of a certificate of merger or consolidation by the Secretary of State.

A certificate of merger or consolidation shall be conclusive evidence of satisfactory performance of all conditions precedent to a merger or consolidation and of the existence or creation of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, except as against the state.

When a merger or consolidation becomes effective, each party to the merger or consolidation plan, except the resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank, shall cease to exist as a separate entity. Upon merger or consolidation, any parties to a merger or consolidation plan shall become a single corporation which shall be the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank and which shall have, without further act or deed, all property, rights, powers, duties, and obligations of each party to a merger or consolidation plan.

The articles of a resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank established from a merger shall be the same as its articles prior to the merger with any change stated in the articles of merger. The articles of a resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank established from a consolidation shall be the same as its articles prior to the consolidation with any change stated in the articles of consolidation.

A resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be authorized to engage only in such business and exercise only such powers as are then permissible upon original incorporation under this chapter and shall be subject to the same prohibitions and limitations as it would then be subject to upon original incorporation.

No liability of any party to a merger or consolidation plan or of its shareholders, directors, or officers shall be affected nor shall any lien on any property of a party to the plan be impaired by a merger or consolidation. Any claim existing or action pending by or against any party to a merger or consolidation plan may be prosecuted to judgment as if a merger or consolidation had not taken place or a resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may be substituted in place of such appropriate party of a plan of proposed merger or consolidation.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.7

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-11.8.
Rights and remedies of shareholders.

A shareholder of a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank which is a party to a plan of proposed merger or consolidation under this chapter who objects to such plan shall be entitled to the rights and remedies of a dissenting shareholder as determined under Chapter 2 of Title 14, known as the “Georgia Business Corporation Code.”

A resulting merchant acquirer limited purpose bank into which other or others have been merged or consolidated may require the return of original certificates of stock held by each shareholder in each or either of the merged or consolidated institutions, or in lieu thereof may:

Issue to each shareholder new certificates for such number of shares of the resulting acquirer limited purpose bank; or

Cause to be paid or delivered to each shareholder the amount of cash or securities of any other corporation or combination of cash and such securities as, under the plan of merger or consolidation, such shareholder is entitled to receive.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-11.8

, enacted by Ga. L. 2016, p. 390, § 4-1/HB 811.

7-9-12.
Limitations on depositors and deposit-taking activities; deposit insurance; self-acquiring activities not permitted.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall only accept deposits from a corporation that owns a majority of the shares of the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall not operate in any manner that attracts depositors from the general public, and no deposit shall be withdrawn by the depositor by check or similar means for payment to third parties or others. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall not accept “brokered deposits” as that term is defined in the Federal Deposit Insurance Act as such existed on January 1, 2012, or the regulations adopted by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation in force and effect on January 1, 2012.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall conduct its deposit-taking activities only from a single location within this state.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank may apply to receive deposit insurance from the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation or its successor agency.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this Code section, the business conducted by a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall be merchant acquiring activities.

A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall not engage in self-acquiring activities.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898.

U.S. Code.

The Federal Deposit Insurance Act, referred to in this Code section, is codified at

12 U.S.C. § 1811

et seq.

7-9-12.1.
Treatment of merchant funds.

All merchant funds shall constitute a trust fund until paid to the individual merchant. A merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall have a fiduciary duty to preserve and account for merchant funds, and merchant acquirer limited purpose banks shall be liable for merchant funds.

All merchant funds shall be deposited immediately by the merchant acquirer limited purpose bank and shall remain in an account at a financial institution that is federally insured and authorized to do business in this state until paid over to the individual merchant; provided, however, that nothing in this Code section shall preclude a merchant acquirer limited purpose bank from making appropriate deductions for chargebacks, fees, reserves, and other costs related to providing authorized merchant acquiring services owed by the individual merchant prior to remitting the net amount to the individual merchant. At the time of deposit into the account, the funds of the individual merchant in the account shall be deemed to be the property of the individual merchant. The merchant acquirer limited purpose bank shall maintain account records that identify individual merchants and the total amount held for each individual merchant. Such records shall be maintained in good faith and in the ordinary course of business and in a manner that can be readily ascertained.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-12.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 344, § 39/HB 184.

7-9-13.
Enforcement by department; rules and regulations.

All merchant acquirer limited purpose banks chartered by the department shall be subject to supervision, regulation, and examination by the department, including, but not limited to, the examination powers as provided in Code Sections 7-1-64 through 7-1-73, and the department shall have all enforcement powers provided in this title.

In the event any chartered merchant acquirer limited purpose bank does not conduct its activities within the limitations provided in Code Section 7-9-12, the department may require such merchant acquirer limited purpose bank to cease all unauthorized activities. In the event such chartered merchant acquirer limited purpose bank fails to abide by such order, the department may:

Impose upon the chartered merchant acquirer limited purpose bank or its parent holding company a penalty of up to $10,000.00 per day for each day such order is violated; and

Require divestiture of such chartered merchant acquirer limited purpose bank by any holding company not qualified to acquire such chartered merchant acquirer limited purpose bank on the date it ceased to operate within the limitations imposed by Code Section 7-9-12 and became a bank for purposes of this title.

The department shall have the power to promulgate rules and regulations implementing the provisions of this chapter.

History.

Code 1981, §

7-9-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 2012, p. 43, § 1/HB 898; Ga. L. 2014, p. 226, § 2/HB 883.